Rhode Island, session 2025, SB236.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-43. Use of impact-reducing soft-shell helmet covers in interscholastic league
football.
(a)(1) Recent developments in sports technology have created soft shell helmet covers.
(2) These soft-shell helmet covers have been shown to reduce the impact of collisions in
contact sports by adding a padded, soft-shell layer to the outside of a traditional hard-shelled
football helmet.
(3) As used in this section, the term “device” shall refer to a soft-shell helmet cover that
adds a padded, soft-shell layer to the outside of a traditional football helmet which layers are
designed to reduce the impact of collisions to the body and the helmet, and thereby reduce the
incidence and minimize the effects of concussions and other trauma to the body.
(b)(1) Effective August 1, 2025, every student participating in the sport of football in the
Rhode Island interscholastic league shall be required to wear an impact-reducing soft-shell helmet
cover device at all times while participating in interscholastic league football games and practices
during any time in which a traditional football helmet would be used. The devices shall be
furnished by their respective school districts to all students participating in these sports; provided
that, a parent, guardian, responsible adult, or a student who is eighteen (18) years of age or older,
may elect to opt out of wearing these devices for practices or games, or both.

(2) These devices shall remain the property of the school district at all times.
(c) The Rhode Island interscholastic league shall promulgate rules, regulations and
standards regarding the selection and use of these devices.
(d) The general assembly may, from time to time, appropriate funds to schools and school
districts to aid in the purchase of these devices.
(e) The provisions of this section shall apply to all public school districts as well as any
other school which participates in interscholastic league football.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001200
========
LC001200 - Page 2 of 3